Hawaii statutes.
[§342G-44] Double-sided copying.
Double-sided copying shall be standard operating practice for all state and
county agencies, offices, and facilities, as available and appropriate. To
increase double-sided copying, each agency in coordination with the department
of accounting and general services, each appropriate county entity, and the
office, shall establish a schedule for the replacement of single-sided copying
machines with double-sided copying machines for all high volume and other
targeted machines that may be identified through the conduct of waste
evaluations. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next